Illinois, session 104th, SB317.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Consumer Artificial Intelligence Notice Act. 6    Section 5. Definitions. As used in this Act: 7    "Conversational customer service artificial intelligence 8system" means a product that: 9        (1) uses "artificial intelligence" as defined in 10    Section 2-101 of the Illinois Human Rights Act; and 11        (2) engages in real-time, interactive text-based or 12    voice-based conversation directly with a consumer through 13    a chat, messaging, or voice interface. 14    "Conversational customer service artificial intelligence 15system" does not include internal business operations, 16marketing, pricing, analytics activities, or other 17transactions that do not involve a direct, real-time 18interaction between the person and the consumer. 19    "Chat interface" means an online interface that allows a 20consumer to exchange real-time, interactive text messages or 21voice communications with a conversational artificial 22intelligence system. 23    "Clear and conspicuous" means that the disclosure appears   SB0317 Engrossed- 2 -LRB104 06436 SPS 16472 b1as a separate message, either verbally or in writing, in the 2language that the user is interacting and communicating with 3the conversational customer service artificial intelligence 4system at the beginning of the interaction in at least the same 5font size and color as the consumer's messages if the 6disclosure is in writing or in a manner that clearly calls 7attention to the verbal disclosure. 8    "Product" means any tangible object or goods distributed 9in commerce, including any service provided in connection with 10the product. 11    Section 10. Requirements. A person who uses a 12conversational customer service artificial intelligence system 13in a chat interface to communicate with a consumer shall 14provide the consumer with a clear and conspicuous disclosure 15that the consumer is communicating with an automated system 16and not with a human. 17    Section 15. Application. 18    (a) Nothing in this Act shall be construed to:19        (1) regulate the use of artificial intelligence that 20    does not interact directly with consumers through a chat 21    interface, including, but not limited to, artificial 22    intelligence used solely for internal analytics, fraud 23    detection, inventory management, pricing, or 24    recommendation systems, or other similar internal   SB0317 Engrossed- 3 -LRB104 06436 SPS 16472 b1    applications; or 2        (2) impose liability on a business entity for the 3    design or outputs of a conversational customer service 4    artificial intelligence developed or provided by a third 5    party if the business entity complies with the disclosure 6    requirements of this Act.7    (b) The remedies provided by this Act are cumulative and 8do not preclude any other lawful civil, administrative, or 9criminal remedy available under State or federal law, 10including, but not limited to, product liability actions. 11    Section 20. Enforcement. 12    (a) The Attorney General or the State's Attorney of any 13county in this State may bring an action in the name of the 14People of this State against any person to restrain and 15prevent any pattern or practice in violation of Section 10. 16Any person that may be subject to an action for a violation of 17Section 10 shall be given at least 7 days advanced notice by 18the Attorney General or State's Attorney prior to the 19commencement of an action to enforce Section 10. The person 20receiving the notice shall have the opportunity to provide an 21assurance of voluntary compliance to the Attorney General or 22the State's Attorney and the Attorney General or the State's 23Attorney may accept the assurance when submitted. The failure 24to perform the terms of the assurance constitutes prima facie 25evidence of a violation of Section 10.   SB0317 Engrossed- 4 -LRB104 06436 SPS 16472 b1    (b) A violation of Section 10 constitutes an unlawful 2practice under the Consumer Fraud and Deceptive Business 3Practices Act. All remedies, penalties, and authority granted 4to the Attorney General or the State's Attorney by the 5Consumer Fraud and Deceptive Business Practices Act shall be 6available to the Attorney General or the State's Attorney for 7the enforcement of Section 10. 8    Section 25. Action for actual damages. Any person who 9suffers actual damage as a result of a violation of Section 10 10may bring an action under Section 10a of the Consumer Fraud and 11Deceptive Business Practices Act.  12    Section 30. Home rule. The regulation of disclosures 13related to the use of artificial intelligence in commercial 14communications with consumers is an exclusive power and 15function of the State. A home rule unit may not regulate 16disclosures related to the use of artificial intelligence in 17commercial communications with consumers. This Section is a 18denial and limitation of home rule powers and functions under 19subsection (h) of Section 6 of Article VII of the Illinois 20Constitution.  21    Section 900. The Consumer Fraud and Deceptive Business 22Practices Act is amended by adding Section 2MMMM as follows:   SB0317 Engrossed- 5 -LRB104 06436 SPS 16472 b1    (815 ILCS 505/2MMMM new)2    Sec. 2MMMM. Violations of the Consumer Artificial 3Intelligence Notice Act. Any person who violates Section 10 of 4the Consumer Artificial Intelligence Notice Act commits an 5unlawful practice within the meaning of this Act.